zh-TW: 藝術/娛樂 > 嗜好和創作藝術 > 樂器 > 弦樂 > 曼陀林: A 型曼陀林; 電子曼陀林; F 型曼陀林
tr: Sanat ve Eğlence > Hobiler ve Sanatsal Çalışmalar > Müzik Aletleri > Telli Çalgılar > Mandolinler: A Tipi Mandolinler; Elektro Mandolinler; F Tipi Mandolinler
pl: Sztuka i rozrywka > Hobby i sztuki piękne > Instrumenty muzyczne > Instrumenty strunowe > Mandoliny: Mandoliny typu A; Mandoliny elektryczne; Mandoliny typu F
pt-PT: Artes e lazer > Passatempos e artes criativas > Instrumentos musicais > Instrumentos de corda > Bandolins: Bandolins estilo A; Bandolins elétricos; Bandolins estilo F
ro-RO: Artă și divertisment > Hobby-uri și artă > Instrumente muzicale > Instrumente cu coarde > Mandoline: Mandoline corp tip A; Mandoline electrice; Mandoline corp tip F
nb: Kunst og underholdning > Hobby og kreativitet > Musikkinstrumenter > Strengeinstrumenter > Mandoliner: A-type-mandoliner; Elektriske mandoliner; F-type-mandoliner
da: Kunst og underholdning > Hobby og håndarbejde > Musikinstrumenter > Strengeinstrumenter > Mandoliner: Mandoliner i A-stil; Elektriske mandoliner; Mandoliner i F-stil
zh-CN: 艺术与娱乐 > 爱好/艺术创作 > 乐器 > 弦乐器 > 曼陀林: A 型曼陀林; 电曼陀林; F 型曼陀林
en: Arts & Entertainment > Hobbies & Creative Arts > Musical Instruments > String Instruments > Mandolins: A-Style Mandolins; Electric Mandolins; F-Style Mandolins
de: Kunst & Unterhaltung > Hobby & Kunst > Musikinstrumente > Saiteninstrumente > Mandolinen: A-Style Mandolinen; Elektrische Mandoline; F-Style Mandolinen
pt-BR: Artes e entretenimento > Hobbies e artes > Instrumentos musicais > Instrumentos de corda > Bandolins: Bandolins estilo A; Bandolim elétrico; Bandolins estilo F
lt-LT: Menai ir pramogos > Hobiai ir menai > Muzikos instrumentai > Styginiai instrumentai > Mandolinos: A stiliaus mandolinos; Elektrinės mandolinos; F stiliaus mandolinos
sl-SI: Kultura in zabava > Hobiji in ustvarjalne umetnosti > Glasbila > Godala > Mandoline: Mandoline A-sloga; Električne mandoline; Mandoline F-sloga
ru: Искусство и развлечения > Хобби и творчество > Музыкальные инструменты > Струнные инструменты > Мандолины: Мандолины стиля A; Электрические мандолины; Мандолины стиля F
th: ศิลปะและความบันเทิง > งานอดิเรกและศิลปะสร้างสรรค์ > เครื่องดนตรี > เครื่องสาย > แมนโดลิน: แมนโดลินทรง A; แมนโดลินไฟฟ้า; แมนโดลินทรง F
bg-BG: Изкуства и развлечения > Хобита и творчески изкуства > Музикални инструменти > Струнни инструменти > Мандолини: Мандолини тип A; Електрически мандолини; Мандолини тип F
ko: 아트/엔터테인먼트 > 취미/예술 > 악기 > 현악기 > 만돌린: A 스타일 만돌린; 전자 만돌린; F 스타일 만돌린
fi: Taide ja viihde > Harrastukset ja taiteet > Soittimet > Jousisoittimet > Mandoliinit: A-tyyliset mandoliinit; Sähkömandoliinit; F-tyyliset mandoliinit
es: Arte y ocio > Hobbies y artes creativas > Instrumentos musicales > Instrumentos de cuerda > Mandolinas: Mandolinas Estilo A; Mandolinas eléctricas; Mandolinas Estilo F
hr-HR: Umjetnost i zabava > Hobiji i kreativne umjetnosti > Glazbala > Gudački instrumenti > Mandoline: Mandoline A stila; Električne mandoline; Mandoline F stila
it: Arte e svago > Hobby e arti creative > Strumenti musicali > Strumenti a corda > Mandolini: Mandolini stile A; Mandolini elettrici; Mandolini stile F
sk-SK: Umenie a zábava > Záľuby a tvorivé dielne > Hudobné nástroje > Sláčikové nástroje > Mandolíny: Mandolíny v štýle A; Elektrické mandolíny; Mandolíny v štýle F
el: Τέχνες & Ψυχαγωγία > Χόμπι & Δημιουργικές Τέχνες > Μουσικά όργανα > Έγχορδα όργανα > Μαντολίνα: Μαντολίνα A-Style; Ηλεκτρικά μαντολίνα; Μαντολίνα F-Style
nl: Kunst en entertainment > Hobby's en creatieve vaardigheden > Muziekinstrumenten > Snaarinstrumenten > Mandolines: A-stijl mandolines; Elektrische mandolines; F-stijl mandolines
vi: Nghệ thuật và giải trí > Sở thích và nghệ thuật sáng tạo > Nhạc cụ > Nhạc cụ bộ dây > Đàn măng cầm: Đàn măng cầm kiểu A; Đàn măng cầm điện; Đàn măng cầm kiểu F
sv: Konst och underhållning > Hobby och skapande > Musikinstrument > Stränginstrument > Mandoliner: A-stil mandoliner; Elektriska mandoliner; F-stil mandoliner
fr: Arts et loisirs > Loisirs et arts créatifs > Instruments de musique > Instruments à cordes > Mandolines: Mandolines de style A; Mandolines électriques; Mandolines de style F
ja: 芸術・エンターテイメント > 趣味・コレクション > 楽器 > 弦楽器 > マンドリン: Aスタイルマンドリン; エレクトリックマンドリン; Fスタイルマンドリン
hu: Művészet és szórakoztatás > Hobbik és kreatív művészet > Hangszerek > Vonós hangszerek > Mandolinok: A stílusú mandolinok; Elektromos mandolinok; F stílusú mandolinok
cs: Umění a zábava > Hobby, hudba a výtvarné umění > Hudební nástroje > Strunné nástroje > Mandolíny: Mandolíny ve stylu A; Elektrické mandolíny; Mandolíny ve stylu F